Arkansas, session 2025, SB414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-4-102(b)(2)(A), concerning the election
of members to a county board of election commissioners, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) Upon receipt of the notice under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section, the county clerk shall send to notify each of the county
election commissioners, by registered mail, in writing within thirty (30)
days of selection as a county election commissioner, a notice of the
requirement to take and subscribe to the oath prescribed by the Arkansas
Constitution.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-7-203(h)(2)(A), concerning general
election primary dates, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A)(i) Each Except as provided in subdivision (h)(2)(A)(ii)
of this section, each county clerk shall at least one hundred (100) days
*SSS147*
03/10/2025 11:18:20 AM SSS147

SB414
before the date of the general election notify by registered mail certified
mail, restricted delivery, the chairs and secretaries of the county
committees of the respective political parties that a certified list of all
nominated candidates for county, township, and municipal offices is due and
shall be filed with the county clerk in order that the candidates' names be
placed on the ballot for the general election.
(ii) Upon written agreement by the chairs of the
county committees of the respective political parties, the county clerk may
notify the chairs and secretaries of the county committees of the respective
political parties by email with a read receipt requested.


























03/10/2025 11:18:20 AM SSS147